Vermont, session 2025-2026, H246.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 181 is added to read:
§ 181. STUDENTS EXPERIENCING HOMELESSNESS AND STUDENTS
EXITING THE FOSTER CARE SYSTEM
VT LEG #380545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.246
2025 Page 2 of 3
(a) Student Liaison Officer. Each postsecondary school operating in
Vermont shall designate an official liaison for students experiencing
homelessness and students exiting the foster care system, to be called the
Student Liaison Officer. The Liaison shall be responsible for understanding
the provisions of the federal and State law pertaining to financial aid eligibility
of current and former foster youth and students experiencing homelessness,
including unaccompanied homeless youth, and for identifying services
available and appropriate for enrolled students who fall under one or more of
these categories. The Liaison shall inform current and prospective students
about student financial aid and other assistance available to youth experiencing
homelessness and current and former foster youth and assist such students in
applying for and receiving federal and State financial aid, including the
eligibility of such students as independent students under the Higher Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1087vv (definition of independent student).
(b) Class enrollment. The board of trustees or other governing body of
each postsecondary school operating in Vermont shall adopt and ensure
enforcement of a policy that gives students experiencing homelessness or
exiting the foster care system priority in class enrollment. The policy shall
ensure such students have access to classes despite work obligations,
transportation issues, or other barriers they may experience at a higher rate
than other students.
VT LEG #380545 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.246
2025 Page 3 of 3
(c) Housing. The board of trustees or other governing body of each
postsecondary school operating in Vermont shall adopt and ensure
enforcement of a policy that gives students experiencing homelessness or
exiting the foster care system priority in accessing existing on-campus housing.
The policy shall require students experiencing homelessness to be enrolled at
least half-time in order to access on-campus housing. The policy shall also
include a plan to provide students experiencing homelessness with housing
during school breaks.
(d) Fees. The board of trustees or other governing body of each
postsecondary school operating in Vermont shall adopt and ensure
enforcement of a policy that allows for waivers of registration fees and
laboratory fees for students experiencing homelessness or exiting the foster
care system.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380545 v.1